Illinois, session 104th, HB252.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Code of Civil Procedure is amended by 5changing Section 1-101 as follows: 6    (735 ILCS 5/1-101)  (from Ch. 110, par. 1-101)7    Sec. 1-101. Short titles. 8    (a) This Act shall be known and and may be cited as the 9"Code of Civil Procedure".10    (b) Article II shall be known as the "Civil Practice Law" 11and may be referred to by that designation.12    (c) Article III shall be known as the "Administrative 13Review Law" and may be referred to by that designation.14(Source: P.A. 82-280.)